California statutes. Vehicle Code
After the requirements for the registration of the vehicle have been complied with, the department shall issue such plates in lieu of the regular license plates. The department shall not issue more than one set of special plates for any licensed class D radio station in the Citizens Radio Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1442.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.

(a) Until December 31, 1984, a person described in Section 5101 may also apply for a set of commemorative 1984 Olympic reflectorized license plates and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of the regular license plates. No commemorative 1984 Olympic reflectorized license plates shall be issued pursuant to an application therefor which is submitted on or after January 1, 1985, but the holder of those plates may thereafter renew or retain them, or transfer them to another vehicle, subject to this section.

(b) The commemorative 1984 Olympic reflectorized license plates shall be of a distinctive design and shall be available in a special series of letters or
 numbers, or both, as determined by the department after consultation with the Los Angeles Olympic Organizing Committee.

(c) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, a special fee of twelve dollars ($12) shall be paid for the transfer of the special plates to another vehicle.

(d) When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when the person determines to retain the plates upon sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the special plates have been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain the special plates.

(e) Until December 31, 1989, duplicate, replacement plates shall be identical commemorative 1984 Olympic reflectorized license plates of the same letter, number, and design as originally
 issued. However, duplicate, replacement plates of the commemorative 1984 Olympic reflectorized license plate series shall not be available on or after January 1, 1990. Thereafter, unless otherwise provided by this code, regular series plates shall be issued for the fee provided in Section 9265 whenever substitute or duplicate plates are requested.

(f) All revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in this section shall be deposited in the California Environmental License Plate Fund pursuant to Section 21191 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 23.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.

(a) (1) Until December 31, 2013, a person described in Section 5101 may also apply for a set of commemorative Olympic reflectorized license plates and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The commemorative Olympic reflectorized license plates shall be of a distinctive design and shall be available in a special series of letters or numbers, or both, as determined by the department after consultation with the United States Olympic Committee. The department may issue the commemorative Olympic reflectorized license plates as environmental license plates, as defined in Section 5103, in a combination of numbers or letters, or both, as requested by the owner or lessee of the vehicle.

(2) On or after January 1, 2014, original, substitute, or duplicate Olympic license plates, including those issued as environmental license plates, shall not be available. However, the holder of Olympic license plates may thereafter renew or retain those plates, or transfer them to another vehicle, subject to this section. Unless otherwise provided by this code, regular series plates shall be issued for the fee provided in Section 9265 whenever substitute or duplicate plates are requested.

(3) On or after January 1, 2014, the holder of Olympic license plates issued as environmental license plates, as defined in Section 5103, may apply for other special license plates using the exact combination of numbers or letters, or both, if authorized by this code, whenever the holder requests substitute or duplicate plates.

(b) In
 addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following special fees shall be paid:

(1) Fifteen dollars ($15) for the transfer of the special plates to another vehicle.

(2) Thirty dollars ($30) for the annual renewal of the special plates.

(c) When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when the person determines to retain the plates upon sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the special plates have been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain the special plates.

(d) All revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in this section, less costs incurred by the department pursuant to this section, shall be
 deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 24.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.

(a) A person described in Section 5101 may also apply for a set of commemorative collegiate reflectorized license plates, and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of the regular license plates. The collegiate reflectorized plates shall be of a distinctive design, and shall be available in a special series of letters or numbers, or both, as determined by the department. The collegiate reflectorized plates shall also contain the name of the participating institution as well as the reflectorized logotype, motto, symbol, or other distinctive design, as approved by the department, representing the participating university or college selected by the applicant. The department may issue the commemorative collegiate reflectorized license plates as environmental license
 plates, as defined in Section 5103, in a combination of numbers or letters, or both, as requested by the owner or lessee of the vehicle.

(b) Any public or private postsecondary educational institution in the state, which is accredited or has been accepted as a recognized candidate for accreditation by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, may indicate to the department its decision to be included in the commemorative collegiate license plate program and submit its distinctive design for the logotype, motto, symbol, or other design. However, no public or private postsecondary educational institution may be included in the program until not less than 5,000 applications are received for license plates containing that institution’s logotype, motto, symbol, or other design. Each participating institution shall collect and hold applications for collegiate license plates until it has received at least 5,000 applications. Once the
 institution has received at least 5,000 applications, it shall submit the applications, along with the necessary fees, to the department. Upon receiving the first application, the institution shall have one calendar year to receive the remaining required applications. If, after that one calendar year, 5,000 applications have not been received, the institution shall refund to all applicants any fees or deposits which have been collected.

(c) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration, a renewal of registration, or a transfer of registration, the following commemorative collegiate license plate fees shall be paid:

(1) Fifty dollars ($50) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.

(2) Forty dollars ($40) for each renewal of
 registration which includes the continued display of the plates.

(3) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.

(4) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.

(d) When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when the person determines to retain the commemorative collegiate license plates upon sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the plates have been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain the plates.

(e) Of the revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in this section, less costs incurred by the department pursuant to this section, one-half shall be deposited in the
 California Collegiate License Plate Fund, which is hereby created, and one-half shall be deposited in the California Environmental License Plate Fund.

(f) The money in the California Collegiate License Plate Fund is, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, continuously appropriated to the Controller for allocation as follows:

(1) To the governing body of participating public institutions in the proportion that funds are collected on behalf of each, to be used for need-based scholarships, distributed according to federal student aid guidelines.

(2) With respect to funds collected on behalf of accredited nonprofit, private, and independent colleges and universities in the state, to the California Student Aid Commission for grants to students at those institutions, in the proportion that funds are
 collected on behalf of each institution, who demonstrate eligibility and need in accordance with the Cal Grant Program pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of the Education Code, but who did not receive an award based on a listing prepared by the California Student Aid Commission.

(g) The scholarships and grants shall be awarded without regard to race, religion, creed, sex, or age.

(h) The Resources License Plate Fund is hereby abolished and all remaining funds shall be transferred to the California Environmental License Plate Fund effective July 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 180.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.1. Motorized Bicycles [5030. - 5039.]

5030.

A motorized bicycle, as defined in Section 406, is required to display a special license plate issued by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5031.

An application by a person other than a manufacturer or dealer for a license plate for a motorized bicycle shall include all the following:

(a) The true, full name and the driver’s license or identification card number, if any, of the owner.

(b) A description of the motorized bicycle, including any distinctive marks or features.

(c) Other information as may reasonably be required by the department to determine whether a license plate shall be issued for the motorized bicycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1221, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5032.

(a) The application for a special license plate for a motorized bicycle shall be made before the motorized bicycle is operated or moved upon a highway, except that, upon the retail sale of a motorized bicycle when there is no license plate, the operator may operate the motorized bicycle for a period of five days from and including the date of sale, at which time application shall be made to the department for a special license plate. If the fifth day should fall on Saturday, Sunday, or a holiday, the application shall be made on the first business day thereafter.

(b) The five-day operating provision set forth in subdivision (a) shall apply only if the operator has in his immediate possession evidence that the motorized bicycle was purchased within the last five days including the date of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5033.

Upon proper application and payment of the fees specified in Section 5036, the department shall issue a special license plate and an identification card for the motorized bicycle for which application was made. Applications may be submitted by mail unless the department determines that it is not feasible to complete the identification process by such method.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5034.

(a) The department may issue a special license plate or other suitable device to a manufacturer or dealer of motorized bicycles upon payment of the fee specified in Section 5036. The license plate shall be of a size, color and configuration determined by the department. The form of the application shall also be determined by the department.

(b) A manufacturer or dealer of motorized bicycles may operate or move a motorized bicycle upon the highways during the delivery of, or during the demonstration for the sale of, the motorized bicycle if the motorized bicycle displays thereon a license plate or other suitable device issued to the manufacturer or dealer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.

Each license plate issued under Section 5033 shall bear a distinctive number to identify the motorized bicycle for which it is issued and shall bear a symbol, letter, or word to distinguish license plates issued under this article from license plates issued for motorcycles and motor-driven cycles. The owner, upon being issued a license plate, shall attach it to the motorized bicycle for which it is issued and shall carry the identification card issued by the department as provided in Section 4454. It shall be unlawful for any person to attach or use the license plate upon any other motorized bicycle or vehicle. If the motorized bicycle is destroyed, the owner shall destroy the license plate and shall within 10 days notify the department on a form approved by the department that the motorized bicycle and license plate have been destroyed.

If the ownership of the motorized bicycle is transferred to another person, that person shall submit, within 10 days, proper application as provided in Section 5031. The license plate shall remain with the motorized bicycle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5036.

A service fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid for the issuance or transfer of a special license plate for motorized bicycles, as defined in Section 406. Publicly-owned motorized bicycles are exempt from the fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5037.

(a) No motorized bicycle first sold on or after July 1, 1981, shall be moved or operated upon a highway unless the owner first makes application for a license plate and, when received, attaches it to the motorized bicycle as provided in this article.

(b) Motorized bicycles first sold prior to July 1, 1981, shall not be moved or operated upon a highway after January 1, 1982, unless the owner makes application for a license plate and, when received, attaches it to the motorized bicycle as provided in this article.

(c) Any motorized bicycle currently licensed pursuant to Division 16.7 (commencing with Section 39000) on July 1, 1981, may be operated upon a highway until July 1, 1982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5038.

The department shall establish a record system that provides for identification of stolen motorized bicycles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5039.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no dealer, manufacturer, salesman, or representative of motorized bicycles exclusively is required to be licensed or permitted pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.3. Historic and Special Interest Vehicles [5050. - 5052.]

5050.

The Legislature finds and declares that constructive leisure pursuits by California citizens is most important. This article is intended to encourage responsible participation in the hobby of collecting, preserving, restoring, and maintaining motor vehicles of historic and special interest, which hobby contributes to the enjoyment of the citizen and the preservation of California’s automotive memorabilia.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 753.)
-------------------------------------------

5051.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Collector” is the owner of one or more vehicles described in Section 5004 or of one or more special interest vehicles, as defined in this article, who collects, purchases, acquires, trades, or disposes of the vehicle, or parts thereof, for his or her own use, in order to preserve, restore, and maintain the vehicle for hobby or historical purposes.

(b) “Special interest vehicle” is a vehicle of an age that is unaltered from the manufacturer’s original specifications and, because of its significance, including, but not limited to, an out-of-production vehicle or a model of less than 2,000 sold in California in a model-year, is collected, preserved, restored, or maintained by a hobbyist as a leisure pursuit.

(c) “Parts car” is a motor vehicle that is owned by a collector to furnish parts for restoration or maintenance of a special interest vehicle or a vehicle described in Section 5004, thus enabling a collector to preserve, restore, and maintain a special interest vehicle or a vehicle described in Section 5004.

(d) “Street rod vehicle” is a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, manufactured in, or prior to, 1948 that is individually modified in its body style or design, including through the use of nonoriginal or reproduction components, and may include additional modifications to other components, including, but not limited to, the engine, drivetrain, suspension, and brakes in a manner that does not adversely affect its safe performance as a motor vehicle or render it unlawful for highway use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5052.

Except as otherwise provided by local ordinance, a collector may maintain one or more vehicles described in Section 5051, whether currently licensed or unlicensed, or whether operable or inoperable, in outdoor storage on private property, if every such vehicle and outdoor storage area is maintained in such manner as not to constitute a health hazard and is located away from public view, or screened from ordinary public view, by means of a suitable fence, trees, shrubbery, opaque covering, or other appropriate means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 753.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.4. Special Interest License Plates [5060. - 5075.]

5060.

(a) An organization may apply to the department for participation in a special interest license plate program and the department shall issue special license plates for that program if the issuance of those plates is required by this article, the sponsoring organization complies with the requirements of this section, and the organization meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Qualifies for tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Submits a financial plan describing the purposes for which the revenues described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) will be used.

(3) Submits a design of the organization’s proposed special interest license plate that, among other things, provides for the placement of the number and letter characters in a manner that allows for law enforcement to readily identify those characters.

(b) Any person described in Section 5101 may apply for special interest license plates, in lieu of the regular license plates.

(c) The design criteria for a special interest license plate are as follows:

(1) The license plate for a passenger vehicle, commercial vehicle, or trailer shall provide a space not larger than 2 inches by 3 inches to the left of the numerical series and a space not larger than five-eighths of an inch in height below the numerical series for a distinctive design, decal, or descriptive message as authorized by this article. The plates shall be issued in sequential numerical order or, pursuant to Section 5103, in a combination of numbers or letters.

(2) Special interest license plates authorized under this article may be issued for use on a motorcycle. That license plate shall contain a five digit configuration issued in sequential numerical order or, pursuant to Section 5103, in a combination of numbers or letters. There shall be a space to the left of the numerical series for a distinctive design or decal and the characters shall contrast sharply with the uniform background color. No motorcycle plate containing a full plate graphic design is authorized. Those particular special interest license plates that were issued prior to the discontinuation provided by this paragraph may continue to be used and attached to the vehicle for which they were issued and may be renewed, retained, or transferred pursuant to this code.

(d) (1) No organization may be included in the program until not less than 7,500 applications for the particular special interest license plates are received. Each organization shall collect and hold applications for the plates. Once the organization has received at least 7,500 applications, it shall submit the applications, along with the necessary fees, to the department. The department shall not issue any special interest license plate until an organization has received and submitted to the department not less than 7,500 applications for that particular special interest license plate within the time period prescribed in this section. Advanced payment to the department by an organization representing the department’s estimated or actual administrative costs associated with the issuance of a particular special interest license plate shall not constitute compliance with this requirement. The organization shall have 12 months, following the effective date of the enactment of the specific legislation enabling the organization to participate in this program, to receive the required number of applications. If, after that 12 months, 7,500 applications have not been received, the organization shall immediately do either of the following:

(A) Refund to all applicants any fees or deposits that have been collected.

(B) Contact the department to indicate the organization’s intent to undertake collection of additional applications and fees or deposits for an additional period, not to exceed 12 months, in order to obtain the minimum 7,500 applications. If an organization elects to exercise the option under this paragraph, it shall contact each applicant who has submitted an application with the appropriate fees or deposits to determine if the applicant wishes a refund of fees or deposits or requests the continuance of the holding of the application and fees or deposits until that time that the organization has received 7,500 applications. The organization shall refund the fees or deposits to any applicant so requesting. In no event shall an organization collect and hold applications for a period exceeding 24 months following the date of authorization as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(C) Sequential plate fees shall be paid for the original issuance, renewal, retention, replacement, or transfer of the special interest license plate as determined by the organization and authorized by department’s regulations. Those plates containing a personalized message are subject to the fees required pursuant to Sections 5106 and 5108 in addition to any fees required by the special interest license plate program.

(2) (A) If the number of currently outstanding and valid special interest license plates in any particular program provided for in this article is less than 7,500, the department shall notify the sponsoring organization of that fact and shall inform the organization that if that number is less than 7,500 one year from the date of that notification, the department will no longer issue or replace those special interest license plates.

(B) Those particular special interest license plates that were issued prior to the discontinuation provided by subparagraph (A) may continue to be used and attached to the vehicle for which they were issued and may be renewed, retained, or transferred pursuant to this code.

(e) (1) The department shall deduct its costs to develop and administer the special interest license plate program from the revenues collected for the plates.

(2) The department shall deposit the remaining revenues from the original issuance, renewal, retention, replacement, or transfer of the special interest license plate in a fund which shall be established by the Controller.

(f) When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when a person determines to retain the special interest license plate upon a sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the plate has been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain and use the plate as authorized by department regulations.

(g) An organization that is eligible to participate in a special interest license plate program pursuant to this article and receives funds from the additional fees collected from the sale of special license plates shall not expend annually more than 25 percent of those funds on administrative costs, marketing, or other promotional activities associated with encouraging application for, or renewal of, the special license plates.

(h) (1) Every organization authorized under this article to offer special interest license plates shall prepare and submit an annual accounting report to the department by June 30. The report shall include an accounting of all revenues and expenditures associated with the special interest license plate program.

(2) If an organization submits a report pursuant to paragraph (1) indicating that the organization violated the expenditure restriction set forth in subdivision (g), the department shall immediately cease depositing fees in the fund created by the Controller for that organization under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) and, instead, shall deposit those fees that would have otherwise been deposited in that fund in a separate fund created by the Controller, which fund is subject to appropriation by the Legislature. The department shall immediately notify the organization of this course of action. The depositing of funds in the account established pursuant to this paragraph shall continue until the organization demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the organization is in compliance or will comply with the requirements of subdivision (g). If one year from the date that the organization receives the notice described in this paragraph, the organization is still unable to satisfactorily demonstrate to the department that it is in compliance or will comply with the requirements of subdivision (g), the department shall no longer issue or replace those special interest license plates associated with that organization. Those particular special interest license plates that were issued prior to the discontinuation provided by this paragraph may continue to be used and attached to the vehicle for which they were issued and may be renewed, retained, or transferred pursuant to this code.

(3) Upon receiving the reports required under paragraph (1), the department shall prepare and transmit an annual consolidated report to the Legislature containing the revenue and expenditure data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5060.1.

Notwithstanding Section 5060 or any other provision of law to the contrary, the department shall not accept an application for participation in a special interest license plate program under Section 5060 and shall not issue, under Section 5060, special interest license plates for a new program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 454, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5061.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the department permits the issuance of a special interest license plate for display on a motorcycle, the department shall not approve any design for that plate that incorporates either or both of the following:

(1) Full or partial graphic designs appearing behind the license plate number configuration.

(2) Symbols within the license plate number configuration.

(b) Any special interest license plate issued for display on a motorcycle is subject to the same fees that are collected for the issuance and retention of special interest license plates on other vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 859, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Rosenthal Blue Sky License Plate Program.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that CALSTART is a California nonprofit consortium dedicated to the development and commercialization of advanced transportation technologies, including clean fuel vehicles, and that CALSTART should be authorized to undertake a special environmental “Blue Sky” license plate program to facilitate the purchase and use of clean fuel vehicles in the state.

(c) CALSTART may, with the approval of the department, participate in this special interest license plate program.

(d) CALSTART may, with the approval of the department, develop a distinctive design, in conformance with Section 5060, for inclusion on a special interest license plate. The license plate shall be known as the Blue Sky license plate and shall signify that the vehicle to which it is assigned is a clean fuel vehicle.

(e) Any person who owns or leases a clean fuel vehicle, as defined in Section 257, and who applies for an original or renewal registration of that vehicle, may apply, through CALSTART, for a set of Blue Sky license plates in lieu of regular license plates.

(f) The Blue Sky license plate is subject to Sections 5106 and 5108. The revenues derived from the sale of the license plates shall be deposited in the California Environmental License Plate Fund, after the department has deducted its costs for developing and administering the program.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 5060, a Blue Sky license plate may, upon application of the holder, be transferred to another clean fuel vehicle. If the vehicle to which transfer is sought is not a clean fuel vehicle, the plates shall be surrendered to the department.

(h) CALSTART, in coordination with the State Air Resources Board, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, and the Public Utilities Commission, shall undertake efforts to publicize the availability of Blue Sky license plates.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 5060, CALSTART shall have 12 months, commencing November 1, 1995, to receive the required applications and to notify the department that the requisite number of applications have been received. If, after that 12-month period, 5,000 applications have not been received, CALSTART shall immediately notify the department and refund to all applicants any fees or deposits which have been collected.

(j) If, on November 1, 1996, the department has not received a notice from CALSTART pursuant to subdivision (i) or if, on or before that date CALSTART notifies the department that the requisite number of applications have not been received, the department shall provide that information to the Secretary of State, and this section shall become inoperative upon receipt of that information by the Secretary of State, and shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1997, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which is enacted before January 1, 1997, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1159, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in subd. (j).   If it became inoperative, this section was repealed on January 1, 1997, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5064.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Yosemite Foundation, shall design and make available for issuance pursuant to this article special environmental design license plates bearing, notwithstanding Section 5060, a full-plate graphic design depicting a significant feature or quality of Yosemite National Park. Any person described in Section 5101, upon payment of the additional fees set forth in subdivision (b), may apply for and be issued a set of special environmental design license plates. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5060, the plates may be issued in a combination of numbers or letters, or both, requested by the owner or lessee of the vehicle.

(b) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following additional fees shall be paid for the issuance, renewal, or transfer of the special environmental design license plates authorized pursuant to this section:

(1) For the original issuance of the plates, fifty dollars ($50).

(2) For a renewal of registration with the plates, forty dollars ($40).

(3) For transfer of the plates to another vehicle, fifteen dollars ($15).

(4) For each substitute replacement plate, thirty-five dollars ($35).

(5) For the conversion of an existing environmental license plate to the special environmental design license plate authorized pursuant to this section, sixty-five dollars ($65).

(c) After deducting its administrative costs under this section, the department shall deposit the additional revenue derived from the issuance, renewal, transfer, and substitution of special environmental design license plates as follows:

(1) One-half in the Yosemite Foundation Account, which is hereby created in the California Environmental License Plate Fund. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the money in the account shall be allocated by the Controller to the Yosemite Foundation or its successor for expenditure for the exclusive trust purposes of preservation and restoration projects in Yosemite National Park.

(2) One-half in the California Environmental License Plate Fund.

(d) The Yosemite Foundation shall report to the Legislature on or before June 30 of each year on its use and expenditure of the money in the Yosemite Foundation Account, beginning one year after the initial issuance of the special interest license plates authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 58.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5066.

(a) The department, in conjunction with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall design and make available for issuance pursuant to this article the California memorial license plate. Notwithstanding Section 5060, the California memorial license plate may be issued in a combination of numbers or letters, or both, as requested by the applicant for the plates. A person described in Section 5101, upon payment of the additional fees set forth in subdivision (b), may apply for and be issued a set of California memorial license plates.

(b) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following additional fees shall be paid for the issuance, renewal, retention, or transfer of the California memorial license
 plates authorized pursuant to this section:

(1) For the original issuance of the plates, fifty dollars ($50).

(2) For a renewal of registration of the plates or retention of the plates, if renewal is not required, forty dollars ($40).

(3) For transfer of the plates to another vehicle, fifteen dollars ($15).

(4) For each substitute replacement plate, thirty-five dollars ($35).

(5) In addition, for the issuance of an environmental license plate, as defined in Section 5103, the additional fees required pursuant to Sections 5106 and 5108 shall be deposited proportionately in the funds described in subdivision (c).

(c) The
 department shall deposit the additional revenue derived from the issuance, renewal, transfer, and substitution of California memorial license plates in the Antiterrorism Fund, which is hereby created in the General Fund.

(1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, one-half of the money in the fund shall be allocated by the Controller to the Office of Emergency Services to be used solely for antiterrorism activities. The office shall not use more than 5 percent of the money appropriated for local antiterrorism efforts for administrative purposes.

(2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or in another statute, one-half of the money in the fund shall be used solely for antiterrorism activities.

(d) The department shall deduct its costs to administer, but not to develop, the California memorial
 license plate program. The department may use an amount of money, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) annually, derived from the issuance, renewal, transfer, and substitution of California memorial license plates for the continued promotion of the California memorial license plate program of this section.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “antiterrorism activities” means activities related to the prevention, detection, and emergency response to terrorism that are undertaken by state and local law enforcement, fire protection, and public health agencies. The funds provided for these activities, to the extent that funds are available, shall be used exclusively for purposes directly related to fighting terrorism. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, hiring support staff to perform administrative tasks, hiring and training additional law enforcement, fire protection, and public health personnel, response training for
 existing and additional law enforcement, fire protection, and public health personnel, and hazardous materials and other equipment expenditures.

(f) Beginning January 1, 2007, and each January 1 thereafter, the department shall determine the number of currently outstanding and valid California memorial license plates. If that number is less than 7,500 in any year, then the department shall no longer issue or replace those plates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 32, Sec. 11.   (SB 87)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5067.

(a) The department, in consultation with the California Coastal Commission, shall design and make available for issuance pursuant to this article special environmental design license plates. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5060, the special environmental design license plates shall bear a graphic design depicting a California coastal motif and may be issued in a combination of numbers or letters, or both, as requested by the applicant for the plates. Any person described in Section 5101 may, upon payment of the additional fees set forth in subdivision (b), apply for and be issued a set of special environmental design license plates.

(b) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following additional fees shall be paid for the issuance, renewal, retention, or transfer of the special environmental design license plates authorized pursuant to this section:

(1) For the original issuance of the plates, fifty dollars ($50).

(2) For a renewal of registration of the plates or retention of the plates, if renewal is not required, forty dollars ($40).
